Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201012-805
Abandoned or neglected cemeteries; care and maintenance.

The county board shall expend money from the general fund of the county for the care and maintenance of each abandoned or neglected cemetery. Such amount shall not exceed one thousand dollars per cemetery in a calendar year. Such care and maintenance may include the repair or building of fences and annual spraying for the control of weeds and brush.

Laws 1931, c. 40, § 1, p. 135;

Laws 1933, c. 36, § 1, p. 237;

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 5, p. 146;

Laws 1941, c. 48, § 2, p. 236;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-105;

Laws 1943, c. 57, § 1(9), p. 226;

R.S.1943, § 23-113;

Laws 1949, c. 35, § 1, p. 128;

Laws 1973, LB 277, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 608, § 1;

C.S.Supp.,1974, § 23-113;

Laws 2001, LB 280, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB995, § 3.